Utah statutes.
64-13d-106.   Monitoring contracts.
(1)  The executive director or his designee shall monitor the performance of
all facilities incarcerating inmates under the jurisdiction of the department.
(2)  The executive director or his designee shall have unlimited access to all
facilities, records, and staff for monitoring purposes.
(3)  The executive director may appoint a monitor to inspect a facility.  The
monitor shall have unlimited access to all facilities, records, and staff for
monitoring purposes.
(4)  The department shall be reimbursed by the entity operating the facility
for that portion of the salary and expenses of the monitor attributable to
monitoring the particular facility.
(5)  Monitoring consists of ensuring that:
(a)  all state laws, department rules, and contractual obligations applicable
to the facility are being met; and
(b)  all operations are effective, efficient, and economical.
